Vermont, session 2025-2026, H677.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 248 is amended to read:
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 2 of 7
§ 248. NEW GAS AND ELECTRIC PURCHASES, INVESTMENTS, AND
FACILITIES; CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD
(a)(1) No company, as defined in section 201 of this subchapter, may:
* * *
(4)(A) With respect to a facility located in the State, in response to a
request from one or more members of the public or a party, the Public Utility
Commission shall hold a nonevidentiary public hearing on a petition for such
finding and certificate. The public hearing shall either be remotely accessible
or held in at least one county in which any portion of the construction of the
facility is proposed to be located, or both. The Commission in its discretion
may hold a nonevidentiary public hearing in the absence of any request from a
member of the public or a party. From the comments made at a public hearing,
the Commission shall derive areas of inquiry that are relevant to the findings to
be made under this section and shall address each such area in its decision.
Prior to making findings, if the record does not contain evidence on such an
area, the Commission shall direct the parties to provide evidence on the area.
This subdivision (4) does not require the Commission to respond to each
individual comment.
* * *
(E) The Agency of Natural Resources and the Agency of Agriculture,
Food and Markets shall appear as a party parties in any proceedings held under
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 3 of 7
this subsection (a), shall provide evidence and recommendations concerning
any findings to be made under subdivision (b)(5) of this section, and may
provide evidence and recommendations concerning any other matters to be
determined by the Commission in such a proceeding.
(F) The following shall apply to the participation of the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets in proceedings held under this subsection (a):
(i) In any proceeding regarding an electric generation facility that
will have a capacity greater than 500 kilowatts or an energy storage facility
that will have a capacity greater than 1 megawatt and will be sited on a tract
containing primary agricultural soils as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001, the
Agency shall appear as a party and provide evidence and recommendations
concerning any findings to be made under subdivision (b)(5) of this section on
those soils and may provide evidence and recommendations concerning any
other matters to be determined by the Commission in such a proceeding.
(ii) In a proceeding other than one described in subdivision (i) of
this subdivision (4)(F), the Agency shall have the right to appear and
participate.
* * *
(J) This subdivision (J) applies to an application for an electric
generation facility with a capacity that is greater than 50 kilowatts and to an
application for an energy storage facility that is greater than 1 megawatt, unless
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 4 of 7
the facility is located on a new or existing structure the primary purpose of
which is not the generation of electricity. In addition to any other information
required by the Commission, the application for such a facility shall include
information that delineates:
(i) the full limits of physical disturbance due to the construction
and operation of the facility and related infrastructure, including areas
disturbed due to the creation or modification of access roads and utility lines
and the clearing or management of vegetation;
(ii) the presence and total acreage of primary, secondary, and local
importance agricultural soils as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001 and by the Natural
Resources Conservation Service on each tract to be physically disturbed in
connection with the construction and operation of the facility, the amount of
those soils to be disturbed, and any other proposed impacts to those soils;
(iii) all visible infrastructure associated with the facility; and
(iv) all impacts of the facility’s construction and operation under
subdivision (b)(5) of this section, including impacts due to the creation or
modification of access roads and utility lines and the clearing or management
of vegetation.
* * *
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 5 of 7
(b) Before the Public Utility Commission issues a certificate of public good
as required under subsection (a) of this section, it shall find that the purchase,
investment, or construction:
* * *
(2)(A) Is required to meet the need for present and future demand for
service that could not otherwise be provided in a more cost-effective manner
through energy conservation programs and measures and energy-efficiency
and load management measures, including those developed pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 209(d), section 218c, and subsection 218(b) of this
title. In determining whether this criterion is met, the Commission shall assess
the environmental and economic costs of the purchase, investment, or
construction in the manner set out under subdivision 218c(a)(1) (least cost
integrated plan) of this title and, as to a generation facility, shall consider
whether the facility will avoid, reduce, or defer transmission or distribution
system investments.
(B) With respect to a solar energy generation facility, to meet this
criterion, a Vermont-licensed engineering firm approved by the Department of
Environmental Conservation shall perform a full-spectrum audit of energy
payback time and carbon dioxide emissions at the cost of the applicant. The
audit shall include a cradle-to-grave calculation, including resource extraction;
mining and procurement; production manufacturing and transportation;
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 6 of 7
deployment and disposal of all technologies required including solar panels
concrete, footings, transformers, batteries; forest ecosystem destruction;
foregoing 25 years of agricultural crops; and construction and landscaping of
the project.
* * *
(5) With respect to an in-state facility, will not have an undue adverse
effect on aesthetics, historic sites, air and water purity, the natural
environment, the use of natural resources, and the public health and safety,
with due consideration having been given to the criteria specified in 10 V.S.A.
§§ 1424a(d) and 6086(a)(1) through (8) and (9)(K), impacts to primary
agricultural soils, agricultural soils of statewide importance or local importance
as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001 and as designated by the Natural Resources
Conservation Service, and greenhouse gas impacts. The siting of a facility or
group of physically adjacent or interrelated facilities such that facility
structures and related infrastructure preclude the tilling of soil, seeding,
growing, or harvesting of agricultural crops on greater than five acres of
primary, statewide, or local importance agricultural soils, or reduce future
Vermont-based food security or will result in the destruction of forest
ecosystems, forest soils and their unique biology, or increased volatilization
and release of forest soil carbon on more than five acres shall be considered
undue and not in the public good.
VT LEG #385284 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.677
2026 Page 7 of 7
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385284 v.3